District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.12

Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)

The terms “apartment house,” “tenement house,” and “flat” mean a building in which rooms in suites are provided for occupancy by 3 or more families.

(2)

The term “rooming house” means a building in which rooms are rented and sleeping quarters provided to accommodate 10 or more persons, not including the family of the owner or lessee.

(3)

The term “lodging house” means a building in which sleeping quarters are provided to accommodate 10 or more transients.

(4)

The term “hotel” means a building in which meals are served and rooms are provided for the accommodation of 10 or more transients.

(5)

The term “elevator shaft” includes a dumbwaiter shaft.

(6)

The term “fire escape” means an exterior open stairway or arrangement of ladders constructed entirely of incombustible materials and of approved design, or an interior or exterior stairway of fire-resistive construction with enclosing walls of masonry with fire-resistive doors and windows.

(7)

The term “standpipe” means a vertical iron or steel pipe provided with hose connections and valves, so arranged as to supply water for firefighting purposes.

(8)

The terms “fireproof ” and “fire-resistive” have the same meaning as is ascribed to the term “fire-resistive” in the Building Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986.

History

Mar. 19, 1906, ch. 957, § 12
June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 846, ch. 388
Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 13(d), 34 DCR 1072

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-512.
1973 Ed., § 5-312.

References in Text

The “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986,” referred to in paragraph (8), is D.C. Law 6-216.